Massachusetts, session 194th, S2493.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition
is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof, the following:-
Effective July first of every year, the Secretary shall prescribe the increase in the shelter
allowance by a percentage amount equal to the percentage rise in the United States Consumer
Price Index for January first of that year over the level of said index for January first of the
previous year plus such additional percentage amount as is recommended annually by the
secretary and appropriated by the general court.
of 1